Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.420

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Partnership" means the domestic partnership in which the dissenter holds or held a partnership interest, or the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation by merger, whether foreign or domestic, of that partnership.

(2) "Dissenter" means a partner who is entitled to dissent from a plan of merger and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by this article.

(3) "Fair value," with respect to a dissenter's partnership interest, means the value of the partner's interest immediately before the effectuation of the merger to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the merger unless exclusion would be inequitable.

(4) "Interest" means interest from the effective date of the merger until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the partnership on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

[ 1998 c 103 s 1001.]